Utah statutes.
78B-17-203.   Depositions, production, inspection, and contempt remedies for subpoenas.

Section 78B-6-301 and Utah Rules of Civil Procedure 26 through 37 and 45 apply to subpoenas issued under Section 78B-17-201.



Enacted by Chapter 278, 2008 General Session

